Tennessee, session 114, HB1388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 12, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, subject to approval by the state
building commission, the state shall enter into good faith negotiations for the
management of the Cotton Museum and, upon approval, shall transfer management and
control of the Cotton Museum to the state museum, to be managed by the Douglas
Henry state museum commission in collaboration with the Tennessee historical
commission.
SECTION 2. This act is not an appropriation of funds, and funds must not be obligated
or expended pursuant to this act unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general
appropriations act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1388
003336
- 1 -